Utah statutes.
34A-2-105.   Exclusive remedy against employer, and officer, agent, or employee of employer.

(1)  The right to recover compensation pursuant to this chapter for injuries sustained by an employee, whether resulting in death or not, is the exclusive remedy against the employer and is the exclusive remedy against any officer, agent, or employee of the employer and the liabilities of the employer imposed by this chapter is in place of any and all other civil liability whatsoever, at common law or otherwise, to the employee or to the employee's spouse, widow, children, parents, dependents, next of kin, heirs, personal representatives, guardian, or any other person whomsoever, on account of any accident or injury or death, in any way contracted, sustained, aggravated, or incurred by the employee in the course of or because of or arising out of the employee's employment, and an action at law may not be maintained against an employer or against any officer, agent, or employee of the employer based upon any accident, injury, or death of an employee.  Nothing in this section prevents an employee, or the employee's dependents, from filing a claim for compensation in those cases in accordance with Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.

(2)  The exclusive remedy provisions of this section apply to both the client and the professional employer organization in a coemployment relationship regulated under Title 31A, Chapter 40, Professional Employer Organization Licensing Act.

(3) (a)  For purposes of this section:

(i)  "Temporary employee" means an individual who for temporary work assignment is:

(A)  an employee of a temporary staffing company; or

(B)  registered by or otherwise associated with a temporary staffing company.

(ii)  "Temporary staffing company" means a company that engages in the assignment of individuals as temporary full-time or part-time employees to fill assignments with a finite ending date to another independent entity.

(b)  If the temporary staffing company secures the payment of workers' compensation in accordance with Section 34A-2-201 for all temporary employees of the temporary staffing company, the exclusive remedy provisions of this section apply to both the temporary staffing company and the client company and its employees and provide the temporary staffing company the same protection that a client company and its employees has under this section for the acts of any of the temporary staffing company's temporary employees on assignment at the client company worksite.



Amended by Chapter 318, 2008 General Session

